src/phonology/lut-phon.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Lushootseed morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d g h i k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì â ê ô û î ã ý


!! The Lushootseed language is written in lower case only
 A B C D G H I K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý

!! This transformation, accent loss, will be moved to post dict.
á:a
ú:u
í:i
ə́:ə


b̓

c̓ !! c U+0313
č
č̓
dᶻ
ə
gʷ
ǰ

k̓
kʷ
k̓ʷ

l̕
ɬ
ƛ̕

m̓
n̓

p̓

q
q̓
qʷ
q̓ʷ

š

t̕

w̓
y̓

x̌
xʷ
x̌ʷ

y̓
ʔ
!! Lushootseed is written in IPA, there are no upper-case letters


%{p5%}:b̓
%{p5%}:c̓
%{p5%}:č
%{p5%}:č̓
%{p5%}:dᶻ
%{p5%}:gʷ
%{p5%}:ǰ
%{p5%}:k̓
%{p5%}:kʷ
%{p5%}:k̓ʷ
%{p5%}:l̕
%{p5%}:ɬ
%{p5%}:ƛ̕
%{p5%}:m̓
%{p5%}:n̓
%{p5%}:p̓
%{p5%}:q
%{p5%}:q̓
%{p5%}:qʷ
%{p5%}:q̓ʷ
%{p5%}:š
%{p5%}:t̕
%{p5%}:w̓
%{p5%}:y
%{p5%}:x̌
%{p5%}:xʷ
%{p5%}:x̌ʷ
%{p5%}:y̓
%{p5%}:ʔ

%{p4%}:a
%{p4%}:i
!%{p4%}:o
%{p4%}:u
!%{p4%}:á
!%{p4%}:ú
!%{p4%}:í
!%{p4%}:ə́
%{p4%}:ə


%{p3%}:b̓
%{p3%}:c̓
%{p3%}:č
%{p3%}:č̓
%{p3%}:dᶻ
%{p3%}:gʷ
%{p3%}:ǰ
%{p3%}:k̓
%{p3%}:kʷ
%{p3%}:k̓ʷ
%{p3%}:l̕
%{p3%}:ɬ
%{p3%}:ƛ̕
%{p3%}:m̓
%{p3%}:n̓
%{p3%}:p̓
%{p3%}:q
%{p3%}:q̓
%{p3%}:qʷ
%{p3%}:q̓ʷ
%{p3%}:š
%{p3%}:t̕
%{p3%}:w̓
%{p3%}:y
%{p3%}:x̌
%{p3%}:xʷ
%{p3%}:x̌ʷ
%{p3%}:y̓
%{p3%}:ʔ

%{p2%}:a
%{p2%}:i
!%{p2%}:o
%{p2%}:u
!%{p2%}:á
!%{p2%}:ú
!%{p2%}:í
!%{p2%}:ə́
%{p2%}:ə


%{p1%}:b̓
%{p1%}:c̓
%{p1%}:č
%{p1%}:č̓
%{p1%}:dᶻ
%{p1%}:gʷ
%{p1%}:ǰ
%{p1%}:k̓
%{p1%}:kʷ
%{p1%}:k̓ʷ
%{p1%}:l̕
%{p1%}:ɬ
%{p1%}:ƛ̕
%{p1%}:m̓
%{p1%}:n̓
%{p1%}:p̓
%{p1%}:q
%{p1%}:q̓
%{p1%}:qʷ
%{p1%}:q̓ʷ
%{p1%}:š
%{p1%}:t̕
%{p1%}:w̓
%{p1%}:y
%{p1%}:x̌
%{p1%}:xʷ
%{p1%}:x̌ʷ
%{p1%}:y̓
%{p1%}:ʔ



! 3-segment reduplication
R31:b R31:l

R32:l
E3:ə
!! place holders
%{p1%}:0
%{p2%}:0
%{p3%}:0
%{p4%}:0
%{p5%}:0
%{p6%}:0
%{p7%}:0

! triggers
%^Red1CV2CiCV:0 !!= * @CODE@ qəlb: qiqəlb __rain showers__
%^Red1CV1toCV2C:0 !!= * @CODE@ 2-segment to 3-segments with vowel change 
%^Red1CV1toCV2CPL:0 !!= * @CODE@ 2-segment to 3-segments with vowel change Plural

%^Red2CVC2CVCCVC:0 !!= * @CODE@ 3-segment reduplication 




! Morpheme boundaries:
 «  ! Derivational prefix
 »  ! Derivational suffix
 %< ! Inflectional prefx
 %> ! Inflectional suffix
 #  ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds

 ! Escaped chars
 %  

        !! !!Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):
 »7     !!≈ ; @CODE@ : Literal »
 «7     !!≈ ; @CODE@ : Literal «
        !! {{{
 %[%>%] !!= @CODE@ - Literal >
 %[%<%] !!= @CODE@ - Literal <

√:0

;


Sets

 Vow = a e i o u y ə
       á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì â ê ô û î ã ý ;

 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z 
š ǰ  č
c̓
č̓
ɬ
l
ƛ̕
w̓
t̕
y̓
p̓
k̓
kʷ
k̓ʷ
q
qʷ
q̓
q̓ʷ
xʷ
x̌
x̌ʷ
b̓
n̓
m̓

ɬ
ƛ̕
ʔ

;

Lts = Cns Vow ;


!! Reduplications are worked with on the basis of the Lushootseed Dictionary by Dawn Bates, Thom Hess and Vi Hilbert. Seattle & London. 1994:xvii

!! Red1
!! C V1 => C V1 C V1 
!!€ s√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}tubš
!!€ s000tu0tubš 
!!€ ʔiɬ√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}t̕isu
!!€ ʔiɬ000t̕i0t̕isu

!! C V1 => C V1 C ə  
!!€ s√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}tuləkʷ
!!€ s000tu0tələkʷ
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}yubil
!!€ 00yu0yəbil
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ɬaɬil
!!€ 00ɬa0ɬəlil
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}k̓ʷid
!!€ 00k̓ʷi0k̓ʷəd

!! C V1 => C V1 C   
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}pastəd
!!€ 00pa0p0stəd
!!€ s√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ʷiƛ̕əyʔ 
!!€ s000x̌ʷi0x̌ʷ0ƛ̕əyʔ

!! C ə => C i C   %^Red1CV1toCV2C:
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ʔəpus%^Red1CV1toCV2C
!!€ 00ʔi0ʔ0pus0

!! Red 1 qəlb: qiqəlb %^Red1CV2CiCV

Rules


! Vowels
"ə:0 in inflection"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 ə:0 <=> »: _ d: %> s: Vow ;
!!€ x̌əd»əd%>sid
!!€ x̌əd000%>cid
    %{p1%}: Cns _ [ Cns | Vow ] Lts:* [%^Red1CV1toCV2C:|%^Red1CV1toCV2CPL:] ;
!! sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom bear
!!€ s√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}čətxʷəd%^Red1CV1toCV2CPL
!!€ s√čiči0č0txʷəd0



!"ə:i in reduplication"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! ə:i <=>
!         [ # | √:0 | %< ] Cns _ 0: [ Cns | Vow ] Lts:* %^Red1CV1toCV2C: ;
!         [ # | √:0 | %< ] 0: 0: Cns _ 0: [ Cns | Vow ] Lts:* %^Red1CV1toCV2CPL: ;

!"0:ə in reduplication"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! 0:ə <=> [ # | √:0 | %< ] 0: _ 0: Cns: ə Cns: Lts:* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;

"%{p2%}:ə in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p2%}:ə <=> %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: Cns: ə Cns: Lts:* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəlups%^Red2CVC2CVCCVC
!!€ 00bəlbəlups0

!"0:u in reduplication"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! 0:u <=> [ # | √:0 | %< ] 0: _ 0: Cns: u Cns: Lts:* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;

"%{p2%}:u in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p2%}:u <=> %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: Cns: u Cns: Lts:* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;

!"0:i in reduplication"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! 0:i <=> [ # | √:0 | %< ] 0: _ 0: Cns: i Cns: Lts:* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;
!         [ # | √:0 | %< ] 0: _ Cns ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] Lts:* %^Red1CV1toCV2CPL: ;

"%{p2%}:i in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p2%}:i <=>  _ %{p1%}: Cns: [i|í:] Cns: Lts:* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;
               _ %{p1%}: Cns: ə:0 Cns: Lts:* [%^Red1CV1toCV2CPL:|%^Red1CV1toCV2C:] ;
               _ %{p1%}: Cns: ə Cns: Lts:* [%^Red1CV2CiCV:] ; 
!! qəlb+N+Pl+Nom: __rain showers__
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}qəlb%^Red1CV2CiCV
!!€ 00qi0qəlb0
!! pišpiš+N+Pl+Nom: __cat/kissa__
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}pišpiš%^Red2CVC2CVCCVC
!!€ 00pišpišpiš0

"%{p4%}:i in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p4%}:i <=> _ %{p3%}:  %{p2%}:  %{p1%}: Cns: ə: Cns: [ Cns | Vow ] Lts:* %^Red1CV1toCV2CPL: ;

!"0:a in reduplication"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! 0:a <=> [ # | √:0 | %< ] 0: _ 0: Cns: a Cns: Lts:* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;

"%{p2%}:a in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p2%}:a <=> %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: Cns: [ a | á: ] Cns: Lts:* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;

"%{p1%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p1%}:0 <=> _ Lts:* [ %^Red1CV1toCV2CPL: | %^Red1CV1toCV2C: | # | %>: ] ;

"%{p2%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p2%}:0 <=> _ %{p1%}: Lts:* \[ %^Red1CV1toCV2CPL: | %^Red1CV1toCV2C: | %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: | %^Red1CV2CiCV: ] [ # | %>: ] ;
              

"%{p3%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p3%}:0 <=> _ %{p2%}:  %{p1%}: Lts:* \[ %^Red1CV1toCV2CPL: | %^Red1CV1toCV2C: | %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: | %^Red1CV2CiCV: ] [ # | %>: ] ;

"%{p4%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p4%}:0 <=> _ %{p3%}:  %{p2%}:  %{p1%}: Lts:*  [ %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: | %^Red1CV1toCV2C: | # | %>: ] ;

"%{p5%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p5%}:0 <=> _ %{p4%}: %{p3%}:  %{p2%}:  %{p1%}: Lts:* [ %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: | %^Red1CV1toCV2C: | # | %>: ];


!! !CONSONANTS
"s:c after d:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
s:c <=> d: %> _ # ;

!!€ ʔu√%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kʷədad%>s
!!€ ʔu0000kʷəda0%>c

"d:0 before s:c"
!! __@RULENAME@__
d:0 <=>	_ %> [ s: #| c ]  ;
!!€ ʔu√%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kʷədad%>s
!!€ ʔu0000kʷəda0%>c
!!€ ʔu√%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kʷədad%>cid
!!€ ʔu0000kʷəda0%>cid


"%{p1%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p1%}:Cx <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ Cns Vow: Cx [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;
           where Cx in (kʷ b̓ ǰ n̓ m̓ p p̓ b t t̕ d dᶻ c c̓ č č̓ s š  ɬ ƛ̕  k k̓ k̓ʷ gʷ h xʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;
!!2017-11-27where Cx in (p b t t̕ d dᶻ č š l l̕ ɬ ƛ̕ w w̓ y̓ k̓ʷ gʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;

"%{p3%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p3%}:Cx <=> _ %{p2%}: %{p1%}: Cx Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;
               _ %{p2%}: %{p1%}: Cx Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* [ %^Red1CV1toCV2C:|%^Red1CV1toCV2CPL:] ;
               _ %{p2%}: %{p1%}: Cx Vow Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* [ %^Red1CV2CiCV:] ;
           where Cx in (kʷ b̓ ǰ n̓ m̓ p p̓ b t t̕ d dᶻ c c̓ č č̓ s š l l̕ ɬ ƛ̕  y w y̓ w̓ k k̓ k̓ʷ gʷ h xʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;
!2019-03-04           where Cx in (p p̓ b t t̕ d dᶻ c c̓ č č̓ s š l l̕ ɬ ƛ̕ y w y̓ w̓ k k̓ k̓ʷ gʷ h xʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;

"%{p5%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p5%}:Cx <=>
               _ %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: Cx Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1CV1toCV2CPL: ;
           where Cx in (kʷ b̓ ǰ n̓ m̓ p p̓ b t t̕ d dᶻ c c̓ č č̓ s š l l̕ ɬ ƛ̕  y w y̓ w̓ k k̓ k̓ʷ gʷ h xʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;
!2019-03-04           where Cx in (p p̓ b t t̕ d dᶻ c c̓ č č̓ s š l l̕ ɬ ƛ̕ y w y̓ w̓ k k̓ k̓ʷ gʷ h xʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;
!! sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom bear
!!€ s√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}čətxʷəd%^Red1CV1toCV2CPL
!!€ s√čičič0txʷəd0

!! liquids

"%{p1%}:l̕ in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p1%}:l̕ <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ [q|y] Vow: l [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;
             %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ Cns Vow: l̕ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;

"%{p1%}:y̓ in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p1%}:y̓ <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ q Vow: y [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;
             %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ Cns Vow: y̓ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;

"%{p1%}:w̓ in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p1%}:w̓ <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ q Vow: w [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;
             %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ Cns Vow: w̓ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;

"%{p1%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p1%}:Cx <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ [Cns - [q|y]] Vow: Cx [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;
           where Cx in (l) ;
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəlups%^Red2CVC2CVCCVC
!!€ 00bəlbəlups0
	   
"%{p1%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{p1%}:Cx <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ [Cns - q] Vow: Cx [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red2CVC2CVCCVC: ;
           where Cx in (y w) ;
